Maryland, session 2025, HB0426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
11–309.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “AUTOMATED SOFTWARE AUDIT” MEANS AN AUDIT OF
ELECTRONIC IMAGES OF BALLOTS CAST IN AN ELECTION USING SOFTWARE THAT IS
INDEPENDENT OF THE VOTING SYSTEM.
(3) “ELECTRONIC COUNT” MEANS THE VOTE TOTALS PRODUCED BY
THE VOTING SYSTEM.
(4) “LOCAL CONTEST” MEANS A CONTEST THAT:
(I) IS NOT A STATEWIDE CONTEST; AND
(II) APPEARS ON THE BALLOT IN ALL OR PART OF A COUNTY,
INCLUDING A CONTEST TO REPRESENT A DISTRICT THAT INCLUDES MORE THAN ONE
COUNTY.
[(2)] (5) “Manual [audit”] COUNT” means inspection of voter–verifiable
paper records by hand and eye to obtain vote totals in a contest [that are compared to the
vote totals produced for that contest by the electronic voting system].
[(3) “Previous comparable general election” means:
(i) in a presidential election year, the presidential election held 4
years earlier; and
(ii) in a gubernatorial election year, the gubernatorial election held
4 years earlier.]
(6) “RISK LIMIT” MEANS THE SMALL, PREDETERMINED MAXIMUM
CHANCE THAT A RISK–LIMITING AUDIT WILL NOT REQUIRE A FULL MANUAL COUNT
OF VOTER–VERIFIABLE PAPER RECORDS IN AN AUDITED CONTEST IF A FULL
MANUAL COUNT OF THE VOTER–VERIFIABLE PAPER RECORDS WOULD FIND A
DIFFERENT OUTCOME THAN THE OUTCOME DETERMINED BY THE ELECTRONIC
COUNT.

HOUSE BILL 426 3
(7) “RISK–LIMITING AUDIT” MEANS A POSTELECTION AUDIT
PROCEDURE THAT EMPLOYS STATISTICAL METHODS TO ENSURE A LARGE,
PREDETERMINED MINIMUM CHANCE OF REQUIRING A FULL MANUAL COUNT OF
VOTER–VERIFIABLE PAPER RECORDS IN AN AUDITED CONTEST IF A FULL MANUAL
COUNT OF THE VOTER–VERIFIABLE PAPER RECORDS WOULD FIND A DIFFERENT
OUTCOME THAN THE OUTCOME DETERMINED BY THE ELECTRONIC COUNT.
[(4)] (8) “Voter–verifiable paper record” has the meaning stated in §
9–102 of this article.
[(b) Following each statewide general election, the State Board shall conduct an
audit of the accuracy of the voting system’s tabulation of votes by completing:
(1) an automated software audit of the electronic images of all ballots cast
in the election; and
(2) a manual audit of voter–verifiable paper records in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section.
(c) Following each statewide primary election, the State Board:
(1) shall complete an automated software audit of the electronic images of
all ballots cast in the election; and
(2) may complete a manual audit of voter–verifiable paper records in a
manner prescribed by the State Board.
(d) (1) Following each statewide general election, the State Board shall
complete a manual audit of:
(i) at least 2% of precincts statewide, including:
1. at least one randomly chosen precinct in each county; and
2. additional precincts selected by the State Board; and
(ii) a number of votes equal to at least 1% of the statewide total in
the previous comparable general election of each of the following, including at least a
minimum number of each of the following in each county, as prescribed by the State Board:
1. early votes;
2. absentee votes; and
3. provisional votes.

HOUSE BILL 426
(2) The manual audit shall be completed within 120 days after the general
election.
(3) If the manual audit shows a discrepancy, the State Board may:
(i) expand the manual audit; and
(ii) take any other actions it considers necessary to resolve the
discrepancy.
(4) Within 14 days after the conclusion of the audit, the State Board shall
post on its website a report that describes:
(i) the precincts and number of votes selected for the manual audit
in each county and the manner in which the precincts and votes were selected;
(ii) the results of the manual audit; and
(iii) any discrepancy shown by the manual audit and how the
discrepancy was resolved.
(5) The State Board shall allow for public observation of each part of the
manual audit process to the extent practicable.
(e) An audit under this section:
(1) may not have any effect on the certified election results; and
(2) shall be used to improve the voting system and voting process for future
elections.]
(B) (1) FOLLOWING EACH STATEWIDE ELECTION, THE STATE BOARD, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE LOCAL BOARDS EACH LOCAL BOARD, SHALL AUDIT THE
ACCURACY OF THE VOTING SYSTEM’S TABULATION OF VOTES IN EACH COUNTY BY
CONDUCTING A RISK–LIMITING AUDIT OF:
(I) AT LEAST ONE STATEWIDE CONTEST; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONE LOCAL CONTEST IN EACH COUNTY; AND
(III) ANY OTHER CONTESTS SELECTED FOR AUDIT BY THE STATE
BOARD.

HOUSE BILL 426 5
(2) FOLLOWING A SPECIAL GENERAL ELECTION, THE STATE BOARD,
IN COLLABORATION WITH THE LOCAL BOARDS, MAY CONDUCT A RISK–LIMITING
AUDIT.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE BOARD SHALL SELECT THE SPECIFIC CONTESTS TO BE AUDITED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) A CONTEST FOR AN OFFICE FOR WHICH THE TERM BEGINS
IN THE MONTH OF DECEMBER MAY NOT BE SELECTED FOR AUDIT UNLESS THE
ELECTION DIRECTOR FOR THE COUNTY AGREES TO AUDIT THE CONTEST.
(4) A RISK–LIMITING AUDIT SHALL:
(I) MANUALLY EXAMINE RANDOMLY CHOSEN INDIVIDUAL
VOTER–VERIFIABLE PAPER RECORDS OR BATCHES OF VOTER–VERIFIABLE PAPER
RECORDS UNTIL THE RISK LIMIT IS MET OR THE CORRECT ELECTION OUTCOME IS
ESTABLISHED;
(II) BE COMPLETED BEFORE CERTIFICATION OF THE ELECTION
RESULTS THE BOARD OF STATE CANVASSERS TRANSMITS A CERTIFIED STATEMENT
OF THE ELECTION RESULTS TO THE STATE BOARD UNDER § 11–503(A) OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(III) BE OBSERVABLE BY THE PUBLIC TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT
PRACTICABLE.
(5) (I) IF A RISK–LIMITING AUDIT FINDS THAT THE ELECTION
OUTCOME DETERMINED BY THE ELECTRONIC COUNT IS INCORRECT, THE OFFICIAL
RESULT OF THE ELECTION SHALL BE ALTERED TO MATCH THE OUTCOME
DETERMINED BY THE RISK–LIMITING AUDIT.
(6) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE CONCLUSION OF THE RISK–LIMITING
AUDIT, THE STATE BOARD SHALL POST ON THE STATE BOARD’S WEBSITE A REPORT
THAT DESCRIBES THE AUDIT PROCESS AND THE RESULTS OF THE AUDIT
INACCURATE, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE
BOARD, SHALL DIRECT THE RELEVANT BOARD OF CANVASSERS TO IMMEDIATELY
INVESTIGATE THE MATTER TO DETERMINE AN ACCURATE ELECTION RESULT.
(II) THE BOARD OF CANVASSERS SHALL CONCLUDE THE
INVESTIGATION WITHIN 3 DAYS.

HOUSE BILL 426
(III) THE BOARD OF CANVASSERS SHALL CORRECT THE
ELECTION RESULT IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE STATE
BOARD.
(6) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL REPORT THE RESULTS OF
THE RISK–LIMITING AUDIT TO THE BOARD OF STATE CANVASSERS AND THE STATE
BOARD.
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE RISK–LIMITING AUDIT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE BOARD, IN COLLABORATION WITH
THE LOCAL BOARDS, MAY CONDUCT AN AUTOMATED SOFTWARE AUDIT AFTER A
STATEWIDE ELECTION.
(D) A LOCAL BOARD MAY CONDUCT A RISK–LIMITING AUDIT OF A LOCAL
CONTEST AT THE DISCRETION OF THE LOCAL BOARD.
[(f)] (D) (E) (1) The State Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION TO CARRY OUT RISK–LIMITING AUDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) CRITERIA FOR DETERMINING THE CONTESTS TO BE
AUDITED;
(II) THE RISK LIMIT; AND
(III) THE AUDIT METHOD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.